Colorado statutes. TITLE 5 Consumer Credit Code
ARTICLE 13
FEDERAL PREEMPTION OF USURY
LAWS - STATE OVERRIDE

Law reviews:

For article, "An Update of Appendices from

C

ollecting Pre- and Post-Judgment Interest in

C

olorado", see 15 Colo. Law. 990 (1986); for article, "Colorado Usury: The Sequel - Part I", see 23 Colo. Law. 565 (1994).

Section

5-13-101. Mortgages.

In accordance with section 501 (b)(2) of Public Law 96-221, it is declared that the state of Colorado does not want the provisions of subsection 501 (a)(1) of Public Law 96-221 removing the limits on the rate or amount of interest, discount points, finance charges, or other charges which may be charged, taken, received, or reserved with respect to loans, mortgages, credit sales, and advances made to apply in this state. The rates established in articles 1 to 9 of this title shall control consumer credit transactions in the state of Colorado.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 399, § 1, effective July 1.

5-13-102. Business and agricultural loans.

In accordance with section 512 of Public Law 96-221, it is declared that the state of Colorado does not want the provisions of section 511 of Public Law 96-221 setting interest rates and preempting state interest rates on business and agricultural loans to apply in this state. The rates established in articles 1 to 9 of this title shall control consumer credit transactions in the state of Colorado.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 399, § 1, effective July 1.

5-13-103. Small business loans.

In accordance with section 524 of Public Law 96-221, it is declared that the state of Colorado does not want the amendments to the "Small Business Investment Act" made by section 524 of Public Law 96-221 prescribing interest rates for small business loans to apply in this state. The rates established in articles 1 to 9 of this title shall control consumer credit transactions in the state of Colorado.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 399, § 1, effective July 1.

5-13-104. Other loans. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 400, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 94:

Entire section repealed, p. 1612, § 12, effective July 1.

5-13-105. General override. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 400, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 94:

Entire section repealed, p. 1613, § 13, effective July 1.